Washington statutes.
RCW 43.190.090

Liability of ombuds—Discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory actions—Communications privileged—Testimony.

(1) No long-term care ombuds is liable for good faith performance of responsibilities under this chapter.

(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be taken against any employee of a facility or agency, any patient, resident, or client of a long-term care facility, or any volunteer, for any communication made, or information given or disclosed, to aid the long-term care ombuds in carrying out its duties and responsibilities, unless the same was done maliciously or without good faith. This subsection is not intended to infringe on the rights of the employer to supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee for other reasons.

(3) All communications by a long-term care ombuds, if reasonably related to the requirements of that individual's responsibilities under this chapter and done in good faith, are privileged and that privilege shall serve as a defense to any action in libel or slander.

(4) A representative of the office is exempt from being required to testify in court as to any confidential matters except as the court may deem necessary to enforce this chapter.

[ 2013 c 23 s 96; 1983 c 290 s 9.]